Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 13. Dissolution.
§ 13.1-915.
Involuntary termination of corporate existence.

The corporate existence of a corporation may be terminated involuntarily by order of the Commission when it finds that the corporation (i) has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law; (ii) has failed to maintain a registered office or a registered agent in the Commonwealth as required by law; (iii) has failed to file any document required by this Act to be filed with the Commission; or (iv) has been convicted for a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(f), as amended, for actions of its officers and directors constituting a pattern or practice of employing unauthorized aliens in the Commonwealth. Upon termination, the properties and affairs of the corporation shall pass automatically to its directors as trustees in liquidation. The trustees then shall proceed to collect the assets of the corporation, and pay, satisfy and discharge its liabilities and obligations and do all other acts required to liquidate its business and affairs. After paying or adequately providing for the payment of all its obligations, the trustees shall distribute the remainder of its assets in accordance with §

13.1-907

. A corporation whose existence is terminated pursuant to clause (iv) shall not be eligible for reinstatement for a period of not less than one year.

Any corporation convicted of the offense listed in clause (iv) of subsection A shall immediately report such conviction to the Commission and file with the Commission an authenticated copy of the judgment or record of conviction.

Before entering any such order the Commission shall issue a rule against the corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard and show cause why such an order should not be entered. The Commission may issue the rule on its own motion or on motion of the Attorney General.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-256; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 506; 1968, c. 116; 1976, c. 350; 1985, c. 522; 1991, c. 310; 2007, c. 925; 2008, cc. 588, 770.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 inserted the subsection designations; and in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” and “Act” for “chapter,” deleted “such” preceding “termination” in the second sentence and added “and affairs” at the end of the next-to-last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 588 and 770 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted clause (iv), added the last sentence, and made related changes; added subsection B; and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

§ 13.1-916.
Reinstatement of a corporation that has ceased to exist.

A corporation that has ceased to exist pursuant to this article may apply to the Commission for reinstatement within five years thereafter unless the corporate existence was terminated by order of the Commission (i) upon a finding that the corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law or (ii) entered pursuant to §

13.1-911

and the circuit court’s decree directing dissolution contains no provision of reinstatement of corporate existence.

To have its corporate existence reinstated, the corporation shall provide the Commission with the following:

An application for reinstatement, which shall include the identification number issued by the Commission to the corporation, and which may be in the form of a letter signed by an officer or director of the corporation, or which may be by affidavit signed by an agent of any member’s interests stating that after diligent search by such agent, no officer or director can be found;

A reinstatement fee of $10;

All annual registration fees and penalties that were due before the corporation ceased to exist and that would have been assessed or imposed to the date of reinstatement if the corporation’s existence had not been terminated;

An annual report for the calendar year that corresponds to the calendar year of the latest annual registration fee that was assessed or that would have been assessed to the date of reinstatement;

If the name of the corporation does not comply with the provisions of §

13.1-829

at the time of reinstatement, articles of amendment to the articles of incorporation to change the corporation’s name to a name that satisfies the provisions of §

13.1-829

, with the fee required by this chapter for the filing of articles of amendment; and

If the corporation’s registered agent has filed a statement of resignation and a new registered agent has not been appointed, a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-834

.

If the corporation complies with the provisions of this section, the Commission shall enter an order of reinstatement of corporate existence. Upon entry of the order of reinstatement, the corporate existence shall be deemed to have continued from the date of termination as if termination had never occurred, and any liability incurred by the corporation or a director, officer, or other agent after the termination and before the reinstatement is determined as if the termination of the corporation’s existence had never occurred.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-255; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1976, c. 350; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 234; 1988, c. 405; 2004, c. 601; 2005, c. 379; 2006, c. 663; 2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 623.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 substituted “$10” for “ten dollars” in the second sentence; and “and any liability incurred by the corporation or a director, officer, or other agent after termination of corporate existence and before the reinstatement shall be determined as if the termination of corporate existence had never occurred” for “except that reinstatement shall have no effect on any question of personal liability of the directors, officers or agents in respect of the period between termination of corporate existence and reinstatement” in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 379, effective March 21, 2005, in the last sentence, substituted “is not distinguishable upon the records of the Commission,” for “has been assumed or reserved or registered by any other person or corporation” and
“engage in” for “transact” and inserted “to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 663, in the first sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii).

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “of” for “for” preceding “reinstatement” in the first sentence, added the language beginning “or may be by affidavit” at the end of the fourth sentence and deleted “the” preceding “termination” in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 rewrote the section.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Reinstatement. —

Because the affairs and assets of the original homeowners association passed to the trustees in liquidation upon automatic termination, and there were no facts reflecting whether, or to whom, title passed after that point, the current homeowners association could be deemed a successor; after the original association failed to apply for reinstatement, it was purged from the State Corporation Commission Clerk’s Information System and was thereafter unable to be reinstated. Mendez v. Huntington Forest Homeowners Ass'n, 99 Va. Cir. 160, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 345 (Fairfax County May 10, 2018).

§ 13.1-917.
Survival of remedy after termination of corporate existence.

The termination of corporate existence shall not take away or impair any remedy available to or against the corporation, its directors, officers or members, for any right or claim existing, or any liability incurred, prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the corporation in its corporate name. The members, directors and officers shall have power to take such corporate or other action as shall be appropriate to protect such remedy, right or claim.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-264; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the” for “such” preceding “corporation” in the first sentence.

§ 13.1-918.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 405.